Maryland, session 2025, HB0406.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
2–202.
(a) (1) The Board consists of 15 members.
(2) Of the 15 Board members:
(i) 3 shall be licensed audiologists who have at least 5 years’ paid
work experience in audiology and are currently practicing audiology in the State;
(v) 3 shall be licensed hearing aid dispensers who have at least 5
years’ paid work experience in dispensing hearing aids and are currently practicing hearing
aid dispensing in the State; and
– 1 –

Ch. 739 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(vi) 2 shall be licensed music therapists who have at least 5 years’
paid work experience in music therapy and are currently practicing music therapy in the
State.
(5) (i) Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, the Governor
shall appoint the audiologist members, with the advice of the Secretary, from a list
submitted to the Secretary and the Governor by the [Maryland Academy of Audiology]
BOARD.
(ii) The number of names on the list shall be at least 3 times the
number of vacancies.
(iii) For each audiologist vacancy, the Board shall notify all licensed
audiologists in the State of the vacancy to solicit nominations to fill the vacancy.
(6) (i) The Governor shall appoint the hearing aid dispenser members,
with the advice of the Secretary, from a list submitted to the Secretary and the Governor
by the [Maryland members of the Hearing Society of Maryland, Washington, D.C., and
Delaware] BOARD.
(ii) The number of names on the list shall be at least 3 times the
number of vacancies.
(III) FOR EACH HEARING AID DISPENSER VACANCY, THE BOARD
SHALL NOTIFY ALL LICENSED HEARING AID DISPENSERS IN THE STATE OF THE
VACANCY TO SOLICIT NOMINATIONS TO FILL THE VACANCY.
(8) (i) The Governor shall appoint the music therapist members, with
the advice of the Secretary, from a list submitted to the Secretary and the Governor by the
[Maryland Association for Music Therapy] BOARD.
(ii) The number of names on the list shall be at least 3 times the
number of vacancies.
(III) FOR EACH MUSIC THERAPIST VACANCY, THE BOARD SHALL
NOTIFY ALL LICENSED MUSIC THERAPISTS IN THE STATE OF THE VACANCY TO
SOLICIT NOMINATIONS TO FILL THE VACANCY.
[(iii)] (IV) On or before December 31, 2021, the music therapist
members shall be board certified music therapists, as defined in § 2–4A–01 of this title.
[(iv)] (V) On or after January 1, 2022, the music therapist members
shall be licensed professional music therapists, as defined in § 2–4A–01 of this title.
2–204.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 739
(a) A majority of the APPOINTED members [currently serving on] OF the Board[,
with at least 1 audiologist, hearing aid dispenser, speech–language pathologist, and music
therapist regulated under the provisions of this title being present,] is a quorum to do
business.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –